Hawaii statutes.
§454F-3 Requirement of licensure. (a)
Effective January 1, 2011, or such later date approved by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to the authority granted
under Public Law 110-289, section 1508(e), title 12 United States Code section
5107(e), a person, unless specifically exempted from this chapter, shall not
engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator or mortgage loan
originator company with respect to any dwelling located in this State without
first obtaining and maintaining annually, a license under this chapter. Each
licensed mortgage loan originator or mortgage loan originator company shall
register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by NMLS and shall
submit to NMLS any reports that shall be in a form and contain information as
NMLS may require.

(b) An independent contractor shall not engage
in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter without a license pursuant
to section 454F-4. Each independent contractor licensed as a mortgage loan
originator shall obtain and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by NMLS.
An independent contractor who is not an exclusive agent of a mortgage loan
originator company, in addition to obtaining a license as a mortgage loan
originator, shall obtain a license as a mortgage loan originator company.

(c) A loan processor or underwriter who does
not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of
communicating or providing information, including through business cards,
stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that the
individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan
originator, who does not advertise that the individual can or will perform any
of the activities of a mortgage loan originator, and who does not engage in the
activities of a mortgage loan originator shall not be required to be licensed
under this chapter.

(d) If this section or any provision of this
section conflicts at any time with any federal law, then the federal law shall
prevail and this section or the relevant provisions of this section shall
become ineffective and invalid. The ineffectiveness or invalidity of this
section or any of its provisions shall not affect any other provisions or
applications of this chapter which shall be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this section are
severable. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §10; am L 2013, c 168, §6;
am L 2016, c 122, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next